lexc/adj/enhuadjmelyige.lexc
! enhuadjmelyige.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [stem]  +Adj @U.ART.PRESENT@ @U.ART.ABSENT@ 

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem +Pref+
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter +Mid
+Ik
      
§J§ §JP§ 
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ 
§t§ §oeoez21§ §oooe2§ §oeoez24§ §AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§
§ooez23§ §uue2§ §EOA22§ §OEOE21§ §AE21§ §UUE2§ §OEOE25§ §UUE21§ 
§OEOE22§ §AE22§ §oeoebbmely§
§OEOE21fazek§ §oeoez17§ §oeoeadjoemely§


LEXICON Root
Prefleg;
Prefigekoto;

LEXICON Prefleg
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto ; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto ; ! optional article prefix
                        Prefigekoto ; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Adjige;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Adjige;
+Pref+:széjjel   Adjige;
+Pref+:szembe   Adjige;
+Pref+:szerte   Adjige;
+Pref+:vissza   Adjige;
+Pref+:helyre   Adjige;
+Pref+:tovább   Adjige;
+Pref+:tönkre   Adjige;
+Pref+:észre   Adjige;
+Pref+:rajta   Adjige;
+Pref+:előre   Adjige;
+Pref+:félbe   Adjige;
+Pref+:félre   Adjige;
+Pref+:felül   Adjige;
+Pref+:fölül   Adjige;
+Pref+:agyon   Adjige;
+Pref+:ellen   Adjige;
+Pref+:körbe   Adjige;
+Pref+:körül   Adjige;
+Pref+:közbe   Adjige;
+Pref+:közre   Adjige;
+Pref+:külön   Adjige;
+Pref+:utána   Adjige;
+Pref+:végbe   Adjige;
+Pref+:végig   Adjige;
+Pref+:hátra   Adjige;
+Pref+:hozzá   Adjige;
+Pref+:egybe   Adjige;
+Pref+:ketté   Adjige;
+Pref+:össze   Adjige;
+Pref+:mellé   Adjige;
+Pref+:által   Adjige;
+Pref+:alul   Adjige;
+Pref+:haza   Adjige;
+Pref+:újra   Adjige;
+Pref+:abba   Adjige;
+Pref+:neki   Adjige;
+Pref+:bele   Adjige;
+Pref+:újjá   Adjige;
+Pref+:benn   Adjige;
+Pref+:fenn   Adjige;
+Pref+:fönn   Adjige;
+Pref+:jóvá   Adjige;
+Pref+:szét   Adjige;
+Pref+:tele   Adjige;
+Pref+:tova   Adjige;
+Pref+:meg   Adjige;
+Pref+:oda   Adjige;
+Pref+:elő   Adjige;
+Pref+:túl   Adjige;
+Pref+:alá   Adjige;
+Pref+:föl   Adjige;
+Pref+:ide   Adjige;
+Pref+:fel   Adjige;
+Pref+:rá   Adjige;
+Pref+:ki   Adjige;
+Pref+:le   Adjige;
+Pref+:el   Adjige;
+Pref+:át   Adjige;
+Pref+:be   Adjige;
            Adjige;

! al only with these
LEXICON AddAdjjajeae
0:^+cMid§oeoebbmely§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocasejajeae;

LEXICON AddAdj
0:^+cMid§oeoebbmely§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocase;

Lexicon Tocase1
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possmmely;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurmmely;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Fammely1;

Lexicon Tocase
[stem]+Adj:0     Possmely;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurmely;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fammely;


LEXICON Possmely
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammely;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammely;
LEXICON Possmmely
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fammely;   ! m
!+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m        Genmely;  ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fammely;   ! d
!+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d        Genmely;  ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammely;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
!+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k Genmely;  ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammely1;


LEXICON Plurmely
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genmely;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genmely;
                            Genmely;
LEXICON Plurmmely
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genmely;
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genmely;
                            Genmely1;
        
LEXICON Fammely
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmely;
                       Genmely;
LEXICON Fammely1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmely;
                       Genmely1;

LEXICON Genmely
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemely;
                       Casemely;
LEXICON Genmely1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemely;
                       Casemely1;
 
LEXICON Casemely
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig

LEXICON Casemely1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
                          Ikmely;

!
!mély 
!
Lexicon Ikmely
+Ik:^ik     Possikmely;
+Ik:^ik     Plurikmely;
+Ik:^ik     Famikmely;
            #;

LEXICON Adjige
alélt AddAdj;
kakilt AddAdj;
nyílt AddAdjjajeae;
pipilt AddAdj;
pisilt AddAdj;
puszilt AddAdj;
rítt AddAdj;
sírt AddAdj;
írt AddAdj;
